Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-2,254
Single event food vendor, defined.

Single event food vendor shall mean a temporary food establishment that operates at no more than one event per calendar year for a period of no more than four days.

Laws 2004, LB 1045, § 3;

Laws 2025, LB245, § 4.